Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-2303
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Diploma
of High School Equivalency Assistance Act:

(1) Fiscal year
means a time period commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30 of the following
year;

(2) High school
equivalency program means a program which is offered by an institution and
provides participants with training and examinations for a diploma of high
school equivalency; and

(3) Institution
means a state agency, a school district as defined in section 79-101, or a
community college area as defined in section 85-1503.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 3.
June 5, 2013